Missouri, session 2026, HB3106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1593, to read as follows:
376.1593. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as
the "End Organ Harvesting Act of 2026".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350. The term "health benefit plan" shall also include MO HealthNet and the state
children's health insurance program authorized under chapter 208;
(2) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350.
The term "health carrier" shall also include the MO HealthNet division and any
Medicaid managed care organization as defined in section 208.431.
3. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall not cover a human organ
transplant or posttransplant care if:
(1) The transplant operation is performed in the People's Republic of China; or
(2) The human organ to be transplanted was procured by sale or donation
originating in the People's Republic of China.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.